Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 2. Purchases, Sales and Transportation; Brand Inspection

Cross references. —

As to brands and brand inspection generally, see chapter 20 of this title.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 28, 32, 36-37, 40-44, 46-47, 49-52; 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 8, 9, 20.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture § 3; 3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 16 to 30, 117, 118.

§ 11-23-201.
Hide buyer; designation.

Any person engaged in
the purchase and sale of hides within this state shall be known and
designated as a hide buyer.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 134, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-1701; C.S. 1945, § 56-1201; W.S. 1957, § 11-436; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-201; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-23-202.
Hide buyer; bill of sale required; contents; copy to seller.

A hide buyer shall require
every person from whom he purchases hides or pelts to deliver to him
a bill of sale for the hides and pelts, executed in duplicate. One
(1) copy shall be retained by the seller and the other copy shall
be kept by the hide buyer and exhibited upon demand of any inspector,
sheriff or deputy sheriff. The bill of sale shall describe by brand
or mark the hides and pelts sold and the date of sale.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 134, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 67-1702; C.S. 1945, § 56-1202; W.S. 1957, § 11-437; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 39; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-202; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-23-203.
Hide buyer; record of purchases to be kept; contents; inspection
by sheriff.

Every hide buyer in this
state shall keep a true record of all hides and pelts purchased by
him, showing the name of the seller of the hides or pelts, the date
of purchase and all brands and other identification marks on the hides
and pelts. The record shall be open for inspection by the sheriff
or his deputy in his county and any livestock inspector.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 134, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 67-1703; C.S. 1945, § 56-1203; W.S. 1957, § 11-438; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 40; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-203; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-23-204.
Hide buyer; inspection for interstate commerce; certificate; fee.

It is unlawful for any
hide buyer within this state to ship or haul any hides or pelts out
of Wyoming unless the hides or pelts have been inspected by a livestock
inspector and a certificate of inspection given therefor. The certificate
shall state the date of inspection, the number of hides and pelts
and the brands and other identification marks thereon. The hide buyer
shall pay to the inspector the fee prescribed by law for each certificate
of inspection issued to him.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 134, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 67-1703; C.S. 1945, § 56-1203; W.S. 1957, § 11-438; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 40; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-203; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-23-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 105, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 134, § 4, related to the railroads prohibited from receiving hides unless inspection made; carriers to receive certificate of inspection.

§ 11-23-206.
Stock killed by transportation company.

When any livestock is
killed by a transportation company within this state, the company
shall cause the hides from all animals killed to be inspected by an
inspector, except where the owner or his agent or employee has seen
and identified the animals.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 134, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 67-1705; C.S. 1945, § 56-1206; W.S. 1957, § 11-441; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 42; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-206; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to prohibiting the removal of hides from carcasses without permission, but making an exception as to railroads, see §

11-30-106

.

As to injury or killing of livestock by railroads, see §§

37-9-304

to

37-9-308

.

§ 11-23-207.
Penalties.

Any person violating
any provision of W.S.

11-23-202

through

11-23-206

shall be punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 134, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 67-1706; C.S. 1945, § 56-1207; W.S. 1957, § 11-442; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-207; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 7, ch. 134, Laws 1921, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.